Maryland, session 2025, HB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
1–301.
(a) The standard time in the State shall be [that of the 75th meridian of longitude
west from Greenwich] EASTERN DAYLIGHT TIME YEAR ROUND.
(b) The standard time described under subsection (a) of this section shall regulate
all courts, banking institutions, public offices, and legal or official proceedings.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on 15 U.S.C. § 260a being amended to allow
the states or a state, individually, to observe a year–round standard time that is consistent
with Eastern Daylight Time.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1290*

HOUSE BILL 1290
(b) (1) The Secretary of State shall monitor action by the federal government
to determine whether the change to 15 U.S.C. § 260a described under subsection (a) of this
section is made.
(2) If the Secretary of State determines that the change to 15 U.S.C. § 260a
described under subsection (a) of this section has been made, the Secretary of State shall
notify the Department of Legislative Services within 5 days after the determination is
made.
(c) If the Department of Legislative Services receives notice of the change to 15
U.S.C. § 260a on or before December 31, 2030, Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the
second Sunday in March or the first Sunday in November after the change to 15 U.S.C. §
260a becomes effective, whichever occurs first.
(d) If the Department of Legislative Services does not receive notice of the change
to 15 U.S.C. § 260a on or before December 31, 2030, Section 1 of this Act, with no further
action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.